Missouri, session 2026, SB1548.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 640.1000, to read as
follows:
640.1000. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, it shall be unlawful for a public water supply
district, operating under chapter 247, or a public water
system, as defined in section 640.102, to discharge fluoride
into water used for human consumption.
2. Any individual may report violations of this
section to the department of natural resources. If the
department finds that a violation occurred, the department
shall ask the attorney general to commence a civil action in
a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that
a violation occurred, the court may grant damages,
injunctive relief, attorney fees, and any such other relief
the court finds appropriate.
✓